Illinois, session 104th, SB2683.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Government Debt Reform Act is amended 5by changing Section 17.5 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 350/17.5)7    Sec. 17.5. Bond authorization by referendum. 8    (a) Whenever applicable law provides that the 9authorization of or the issuance of bonds is subject to either 10a referendum or backdoor referendum, the approval, once 11obtained, remains (i) for 5 years after the date of the 12referendum or (ii) for 3 years after the end of the petition 13period for a backdoor referendum. However, whenever the 14applicable law provides that the authorization of or the 15issuance of bonds under the Water Pollution Control Loan 16Program or the Public Water Supply Loan Program, under Title 17IV-A of the Environmental Protection Act, is subject to either 18a referendum or backdoor referendum, the approval, once 19obtained, remains (i) for 7 years after the date of the 20referendum or (ii) for 5 years after the end of the petition 21period for a backdoor referendum. In the case of bonds 22authorized to be issued under the Downstate Forest Preserve 23District Act and approved by Lake County voters in a November   SB2683 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 13873 JDS 26716 b12008 referendum or in the case of bonds authorized to be issued 2under the School Code and approved by voters of Sandoval 3Community Unit School District 501 in a March 2012 referendum, 4or in the case of bonds authorized to be issued under the 5School Code and approved by voters of Iroquois County 6Community Unit School District Number 9 in an April 2021 7referendum, the approval, once obtained, remains for 10 years 8after the date of the referendum. In the case of bonds 9authorized to be issued under the Counties Code and approved 10by Jackson County voters in a 1994 referendum, of which less 11than $200,000 of the original bonds have been issued, and for 12which the purpose of the bonds is flooding prevention, the 13approval, once obtained, remains for 25 years after the date 14of the referendum. 15    (b) With respect to any bond approval under subsection 16(a), if, for any reason, the bonds are not issued because of a 17court action, then the time limits set forth under subsection 18(a) for the approval for the bonds is tolled during the time 19that the court action is pending. This subsection (b) applies 20to any bond issuance approved by referendum held on or after 21January 1, 2003 or by a backdoor referendum held on or after 22January 1, 2005. 23(Source: P.A. 98-655, eff. 6-18-14; 99-926, eff. 1-20-17.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.